Utah statutes.
36-1-202.   House districts -- Filing -- Legal boundaries.

(1) (a)  The Legislature shall file a copy of the House block assignment file enacted by the Legislature with the lieutenant governor's office.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection 36-1-201.5(5) the legal boundaries of House districts are contained in the House block assignment file on file with the lieutenant governor's office.

(2) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  generate maps of each House district from the House block assignment file and the modifications to boundaries made in Subsection 36-1-201.5(5); and

(ii)  ensure that those maps are available for viewing on the lieutenant governor's website.

(b)  If there is any inconsistency between the maps, the House block assignment file, and the modifications made to boundaries in Subsection 36-1-201.5(5), the House block assignment file, as adjusted by the modifications to boundaries made in Subsection 36-1-201.5(5), are controlling.

